fst/verb_participles.lexc
! Participle declension — generated by scripts/gen_participles.py
! Source: data/external/{twanksta,prusaspira}_entries.json
! Present/passive use two stress-graded stems (long + shortened);
! past-active uses a single invariant stem.

LEXICON VParticiples
  PtcpStems ;

LEXICON PtcpPast
  +Masc+Sg+Nom:uns  # ;
  +Masc+Sg+Gen:ušas  # ;
  +Masc+Sg+Dat:ušasmu  # ;
  +Masc+Sg+Akk:usin  # ;
  +Masc+Pl+Nom:usis  # ;
  +Masc+Pl+Gen:usin  # ;
  +Masc+Pl+Dat:usimans  # ;
  +Masc+Pl+Akk:usins  # ;
  +Fem+Sg+Nom:usi  # ;
  +Fem+Sg+Gen:ušas  # ;
  +Fem+Sg+Dat:ušai  # ;
  +Fem+Sg+Akk:usin  # ;
  +Fem+Pl+Nom:ušas  # ;
  +Fem+Pl+Gen:usin  # ;
  +Fem+Pl+Dat:usimans  # ;
  +Fem+Pl+Akk:usins  # ;
  +Neut+Sg+Nom:us  # ;
  +Neut+Sg+Gen:ušas  # ;
  +Neut+Sg+Dat:ušasmu  # ;
  +Neut+Sg+Akk:us  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Nom:us  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Gen:usin  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Dat:usimans  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Akk:usins  # ;

LEXICON PtcpPresL
  +Masc+Sg+Nom:s  # ;
  +Masc+Sg+Gen:is  # ;
  +Masc+Sg+Dat:ismu  # ;
  +Masc+Sg+Akk:in  # ;
  +Masc+Pl+Nom:ei  # ;
  +Masc+Pl+Gen:in  # ;
  +Masc+Pl+Akk:ins  # ;
  +Fem+Sg+Gen:es  # ;
  +Fem+Sg+Dat:ei  # ;
  +Fem+Sg+Akk:in  # ;
  +Fem+Pl+Nom:es  # ;
  +Fem+Pl+Gen:in  # ;
  +Fem+Pl+Akk:ins  # ;
  +Neut+Sg+Nom:i  # ;
  +Neut+Sg+Gen:is  # ;
  +Neut+Sg+Dat:ismu  # ;
  +Neut+Sg+Akk:i  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Nom:ei  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Gen:in  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Akk:ins  # ;

LEXICON PtcpPresHeavy
  +Masc+Pl+Dat:immans  # ;
  +Fem+Sg+Nom:ī  # ;
  +Fem+Pl+Dat:āmans  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Dat:immans  # ;

LEXICON PtcpPresLight
  +Masc+Pl+Dat:imans  # ;
  +Fem+Sg+Nom:i  # ;
  +Fem+Pl+Dat:amans  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Dat:imans  # ;

LEXICON PtcpPassL
  +Masc+Sg+Nom:s  # ;
  +Masc+Sg+Gen:as  # ;
  +Masc+Sg+Dat:asmu  # ;
  +Masc+Sg+Akk:an  # ;
  +Masc+Pl+Gen:an  # ;
  +Masc+Pl+Akk:ans  # ;
  +Fem+Sg+Gen:as  # ;
  +Fem+Sg+Dat:ai  # ;
  +Fem+Sg+Akk:an  # ;
  +Fem+Pl+Nom:as  # ;
  +Fem+Pl+Gen:an  # ;
  +Fem+Pl+Akk:ans  # ;
  +Neut+Sg+Nom:an  # ;
  +Neut+Sg+Gen:as  # ;
  +Neut+Sg+Dat:asmu  # ;
  +Neut+Sg+Akk:an  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Gen:an  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Akk:ans  # ;

LEXICON PtcpPassHeavy
  +Masc+Pl+Nom:āi  # ;
  +Masc+Pl+Dat:ammans  # ;
  +Fem+Sg+Nom:ā  # ;
  +Fem+Pl+Dat:āmans  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Nom:āi  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Dat:ammans  # ;

LEXICON PtcpPassLight
  +Masc+Pl+Nom:ai  # ;
  +Masc+Pl+Dat:amans  # ;
  +Fem+Sg+Nom:a  # ;
  +Fem+Pl+Dat:amans  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Nom:ai  # ;
  +Neut+Pl+Dat:amans  # ;

LEXICON PtcpStems
  aulānktun+V+Part+Pres:aulānkint  PtcpPresL ;
  aulānktun+V+Part+Pres:aulānkint  PtcpPresLight ;
  aulānktun+V+Part+Pres:aulankint  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  aulānktun+V+Part+Pret:aulānk  PtcpPast ;
  aupaikītun+V+Part+Pass:aupaikīt  PtcpPassL ;
  aupaikītun+V+Part+Pass:aupaikīt  PtcpPassLight ;
  aupaikītun+V+Part+Pass:aupaikit  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  bajjintun+V+Part+Pres:bajinānt  PtcpPresL ;
  bajjintun+V+Part+Pres:bajinānt  PtcpPresLight ;
  bajjintun+V+Part+Pres:bajinant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  bajjintun+V+Part+Pret:bajjin  PtcpPast ;
  belztwei+V+Part+Pass:belzt  PtcpPassL ;
  belztwei+V+Part+Pass:belzt  PtcpPassLight ;
  belztwei+V+Part+Pass:belzt  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  ciwilizītun+V+Part+Pres:ciwilizīnt  PtcpPresL ;
  ciwilizītun+V+Part+Pres:ciwilizīnt  PtcpPresLight ;
  ciwilizītun+V+Part+Pres:ciwilizint  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  ciwilizītun+V+Part+Pret:ciwilizīw  PtcpPast ;
  delagītun+V+Part+Pass:delagīt  PtcpPassL ;
  delagītun+V+Part+Pass:delagīt  PtcpPassLight ;
  delagītun+V+Part+Pass:delagit  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  dwestwei+V+Part+Pres:dwešānt  PtcpPresL ;
  dwestwei+V+Part+Pres:dwešānt  PtcpPresLight ;
  dwestwei+V+Part+Pres:dwešant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  dwestwei+V+Part+Pret:dwīs  PtcpPast ;
  dūmautwei+V+Part+Pass:dūmaut  PtcpPassL ;
  dūmautwei+V+Part+Pass:dūmaut  PtcpPassLight ;
  dūmautwei+V+Part+Pass:dumaut  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  ebsergītun+V+Part+Pres:ebsergīnt  PtcpPresL ;
  ebsergītun+V+Part+Pres:ebsergīnt  PtcpPresLight ;
  ebsergītun+V+Part+Pres:ebsergint  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  ebsergītun+V+Part+Pret:ebsergīw  PtcpPast ;
  ebzentlitun% si+V+Part+Pass:ebzentlit  PtcpPassL ;
  ebzentlitun% si+V+Part+Pass:ebzentlit  PtcpPassLight ;
  ebzentlitun% si+V+Part+Pass:ebzentlit  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  endētun+V+Part+Pres:endīnt  PtcpPresL ;
  endētun+V+Part+Pres:endīnt  PtcpPresLight ;
  endētun+V+Part+Pres:endint  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  endētun+V+Part+Pret:endīw  PtcpPast ;
  enkērmenintun+V+Part+Pass:enkērmenint  PtcpPassL ;
  enkērmenintun+V+Part+Pass:enkērmenint  PtcpPassLight ;
  enkērmenintun+V+Part+Pass:enkermenint  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  enrikaūtwei+V+Part+Pres:enrikaūjant  PtcpPresL ;
  enrikaūtwei+V+Part+Pres:enrikaūjant  PtcpPresLight ;
  enrikaūtwei+V+Part+Pres:enrikaujant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  enrikaūtwei+V+Part+Pret:enrikaūw  PtcpPast ;
  enwaitjātun+V+Part+Pass:enwaitjāt  PtcpPassL ;
  enwaitjātun+V+Part+Pass:enwaitjāt  PtcpPassLight ;
  enwaitjātun+V+Part+Pass:enwaitjat  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  ergalīntun+V+Part+Pres:ergalinānt  PtcpPresL ;
  ergalīntun+V+Part+Pres:ergalinānt  PtcpPresLight ;
  ergalīntun+V+Part+Pres:ergalinant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  ergalīntun+V+Part+Pret:ergalinn  PtcpPast ;
  etgrēnztun+V+Part+Pass:etgrēnzt  PtcpPassL ;
  etgrēnztun+V+Part+Pass:etgrēnzt  PtcpPassLight ;
  etgrēnztun+V+Part+Pass:etgrenzt  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  etprēskintun+V+Part+Pres:etprēskinant  PtcpPresL ;
  etprēskintun+V+Part+Pres:etprēskinant  PtcpPresLight ;
  etprēskintun+V+Part+Pres:etpreskinant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  etprēskintun+V+Part+Pret:etprēskin  PtcpPast ;
  filtrītun+V+Part+Pass:filtrīt  PtcpPassL ;
  filtrītun+V+Part+Pass:filtrīt  PtcpPassLight ;
  filtrītun+V+Part+Pass:filtrit  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  gaīlautwei+V+Part+Pres:gaīlawint  PtcpPresL ;
  gaīlautwei+V+Part+Pres:gaīlawint  PtcpPresLight ;
  gaīlautwei+V+Part+Pres:gailawint  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  gaīlautwei+V+Part+Pret:gaīlaw  PtcpPast ;
  grīmztwei+V+Part+Pass:grīmzt  PtcpPassL ;
  grīmztwei+V+Part+Pass:grīmzt  PtcpPassLight ;
  grīmztwei+V+Part+Pass:grimzt  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  gultwei+V+Part+Pres:gulānt  PtcpPresL ;
  gultwei+V+Part+Pres:gulānt  PtcpPresLight ;
  gultwei+V+Part+Pres:gulant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  gultwei+V+Part+Pret:gull  PtcpPast ;
  izkabīntun+V+Part+Pres:izkabinānt  PtcpPresL ;
  izkabīntun+V+Part+Pres:izkabinānt  PtcpPresLight ;
  izkabīntun+V+Part+Pres:izkabinant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  izkabīntun+V+Part+Pret:izkabinn  PtcpPast ;
  izklìptintun+V+Part+Pass:izklìptint  PtcpPassL ;
  izklìptintun+V+Part+Pass:izklìptint  PtcpPassLight ;
  izklìptintun+V+Part+Pass:izklìptint  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  izweztun+V+Part+Pres:izwezānt  PtcpPresL ;
  izweztun+V+Part+Pres:izwezānt  PtcpPresLight ;
  izweztun+V+Part+Pres:izwezant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  izweztun+V+Part+Pret:izwezz  PtcpPast ;
  izīmlitun+V+Part+Pass:izīmlit  PtcpPassL ;
  izīmlitun+V+Part+Pass:izīmlit  PtcpPassLight ;
  izīmlitun+V+Part+Pass:izimlit  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  kaštūtwei+V+Part+Pres:kaštūjant  PtcpPresL ;
  kaštūtwei+V+Part+Pres:kaštūjant  PtcpPresLight ;
  kaštūtwei+V+Part+Pres:kaštujant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  kaštūtwei+V+Part+Pret:kaštūw  PtcpPast ;
  kliptun% si+V+Part+Pass:klipt  PtcpPassL ;
  kliptun% si+V+Part+Pass:klipt  PtcpPassLight ;
  kliptun% si+V+Part+Pass:klipt  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  kāimawartintun% si+V+Part+Pres:kāimawartinant  PtcpPresL ;
  kāimawartintun% si+V+Part+Pret:kāimawartin  PtcpPast ;
  kōnfliktitwei+V+Part+Pass:kōnfliktit  PtcpPassL ;
  kōnfliktitwei+V+Part+Pass:kōnfliktit  PtcpPassLight ;
  kōnfliktitwei+V+Part+Pass:konfliktit  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  leītun+V+Part+Pres:lejānt  PtcpPresL ;
  leītun+V+Part+Pres:lejānt  PtcpPresLight ;
  leītun+V+Part+Pres:lejant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  leītun+V+Part+Pret:līj  PtcpPast ;
  lōdintun+V+Part+Pass:lōdint  PtcpPassL ;
  lōdintun+V+Part+Pass:lōdint  PtcpPassLight ;
  lōdintun+V+Part+Pass:lodint  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  mīslintun+V+Part+Pass:mīslint  PtcpPassL ;
  mīslintun+V+Part+Pass:mīslint  PtcpPassLight ;
  mīslintun+V+Part+Pass:mislint  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  nalazīntun+V+Part+Pres:nalazinānt  PtcpPresL ;
  nalazīntun+V+Part+Pres:nalazinānt  PtcpPresLight ;
  nalazīntun+V+Part+Pres:nalazinant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  namestun+V+Part+Pret:namett  PtcpPast ;
  pagērdautun+V+Part+Pass:pagērdaut  PtcpPassL ;
  pagērdautun+V+Part+Pass:pagērdaut  PtcpPassLight ;
  pagērdautun+V+Part+Pass:pagerdaut  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  pateikātun+V+Part+Pass:pateikāt  PtcpPassL ;
  pateikātun+V+Part+Pass:pateikāt  PtcpPassLight ;
  pateikātun+V+Part+Pass:pateikat  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  patìkrintun+V+Part+Pres:patikrinānt  PtcpPresL ;
  patìkrintun+V+Part+Pres:patikrinānt  PtcpPresLight ;
  patìkrintun+V+Part+Pres:patikrinant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  patīrintun% si+V+Part+Pret:patīrin  PtcpPast ;
  perrīptun+V+Part+Pass:perrīpt  PtcpPassL ;
  plātwei+V+Part+Pres:plānt  PtcpPresL ;
  plātwei+V+Part+Pres:plānt  PtcpPresLight ;
  plātwei+V+Part+Pres:plant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  plūstun+V+Part+Pret:plūd  PtcpPast ;
  prajātun+V+Part+Pass:prajāt  PtcpPassL ;
  prajātun+V+Part+Pass:prajāt  PtcpPassLight ;
  prajātun+V+Part+Pass:prajat  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  prōtestitun+V+Part+Pres:prōtestint  PtcpPresL ;
  prōtestitun+V+Part+Pres:prōtestint  PtcpPresLight ;
  prōtestitun+V+Part+Pres:protestint  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  publicītun+V+Part+Pret:publicīw  PtcpPast ;
  razgītun+V+Part+Pass:razgīt  PtcpPassL ;
  razgītun+V+Part+Pass:razgīt  PtcpPassLight ;
  razgītun+V+Part+Pass:razgit  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  sensītun+V+Part+Pres:senseījant  PtcpPresL ;
  sensītun+V+Part+Pres:senseījant  PtcpPresLight ;
  sensītun+V+Part+Pres:senseijant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  sentwei+V+Part+Pret:senn  PtcpPast ;
  skrīzitun+V+Part+Pass:skrīzit  PtcpPassL ;
  skrīzitun+V+Part+Pass:skrīzit  PtcpPassLight ;
  skrīzitun+V+Part+Pass:skrizit  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  stēntwei+V+Part+Pres:stēnint  PtcpPresL ;
  stēntwei+V+Part+Pres:stēnint  PtcpPresLight ;
  stēntwei+V+Part+Pres:stenint  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  suppintun+V+Part+Pret:suppin  PtcpPast ;
  telagrafītun+V+Part+Pass:telagrafīt  PtcpPassL ;
  telagrafītun+V+Part+Pass:telagrafīt  PtcpPassLight ;
  telagrafītun+V+Part+Pass:telagrafit  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  wangīntun+V+Part+Pres:wanginānt  PtcpPresL ;
  wangīntun+V+Part+Pres:wanginānt  PtcpPresLight ;
  wangīntun+V+Part+Pres:wanginant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  wargītun+V+Part+Pret:wargīw  PtcpPast ;
  wūlakitwei+V+Part+Pass:wūlakit  PtcpPassL ;
  wūlakitwei+V+Part+Pass:wūlakit  PtcpPassLight ;
  wūlakitwei+V+Part+Pass:wulakit  PtcpPassHeavy ;
  šlaitīntun+V+Part+Pres:šlaitinānt  PtcpPresL ;
  šlaitīntun+V+Part+Pres:šlaitinānt  PtcpPresLight ;
  šlaitīntun+V+Part+Pres:šlaitinant  PtcpPresHeavy ;
  šlapsintun+V+Part+Pret:šlapsinn  PtcpPast ;
